Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.166

Opportunity internship program—List of consortium graduates—Notifying office of student financial assistance of Washington college grant eligibility.

On an annual basis, each opportunity internship consortium shall provide the board with a list of the opportunity internship graduates from the consortium. The board shall compile the lists from all consortia and shall notify the office of student financial assistance of the eligibility of each graduate on the lists to receive a Washington college grant under chapter 28B.92 RCW if the graduate enrolls in a postsecondary program of study within one year of high school graduation.

[ 2019 c 406 s 48; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 242; 2009 c 238 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Intent—2009 c 238: See note following RCW 28C.18.160.